Massachusetts, session 194th, H3538.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6B of chapter 159B of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
official edition, shall be amended by striking the fifth paragraph in its entirety.
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
Department of Public Utilities shall conduct a study for the purposes of making
recommendations on improving the process for determining the rate of reimbursement for the
involuntary towing of motor vehicles.
(b) In conducting its analysis, the Department shall: (1) report on the history of the
process for establishing the rate of reimbursement for involuntary towed motor vehicles,
including the number of rate adjustments, requests for rate adjustments and their outcome; (2)
identify known issues or problems associated with the current process for establishing said rates,
including any distinction between regulatory rulemaking and the rate setting process; (3) provide
an analysis of the methods for determining the applicable rates for involuntary towing used in
of 2

other states; (4) report on the number of tow companies engaged in involuntary towing over time
in Massachusetts, including but not limited to, a delineation of those tow companies who hold a
certificate, but do not engage in involuntary towing; (5) identify the economic factors impacting
towing companies and how such costs are factored into determining the involuntary tow rate; and
(6) determine, to the extent possible, any difference in costs for associated with trespass towing
versus police-ordered tows for companies so authorized under an involuntary certificate.
(c) The Department shall hold at least two public hearings to assist in the collection and
evaluation of data and testimony; provided further, that at least one hearing occur outside of the
City of Boston.
(d) The Department shall prepare a written report detailing its findings and
recommendations, together with drafts of legislation, as may be necessary to carry those
recommendations into effect. The Department shall submit its initial report to the clerks of the
senate and house of representatives, the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and
means and the chairs of the joint committee on telecommunication, utilities and energy not later
than 6 months after the effective date of this act.
of 2